Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2203.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin NEIGHBORHOOD DEVELOPMENT CENTER.new text end new text begin $4,500,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to the Neighborhood Development Center to design, construct, furnish, and equip a new entrepreneur innovation center located in the Lake Street Corridor in the city of Minneapolis. The new building shall include space for entrepreneurs from low-income communities to develop and operate their businesses, and may include a technology accelerator, a beauty, health, and wellness incubator with a small-batch production kitchen, community event and meeting space, a food production kitchen, and retail space. This appropriation is available until the project is completed or abandoned, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end